Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2711
Code of ethics; record of licensees.

The board shall adopt and publish a code of ethics for perfusionists and maintain a record of every perfusionist licensed in this state which includes his or her place of business, place of residence, and license date and number.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 18;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,400.